New York, session 2025-2026, S9792.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision b of section 11 of the court of claims act, as 2 amended by chapter 606 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 b. (i) The claim shall state the time when and place where such claim 5 arose, the nature of same, the items of damage or injuries claimed to 6 have been sustained and, except in an action to recover damages for 7 personal injury, medical, dental or podiatric malpractice or wrongful 8 death, the total sum claimed. A claim for the appropriation by the state 9 of lands, or any right, title or interest in or to lands shall include 10 an inventory or itemized statement of fixtures, if any, for which 11 compensation is claimed. The notice of intention to file a claim shall 12 set forth the same matters except that the items of damage or injuries 13 and the sum claimed need not be stated. The claim and notice of inten- 14 tion to file a claim shall be verified in the same manner as a complaint 15 in an action in the supreme court. 16 (ii) Notwithstanding the failure of a claim to comply with the plead- 17 ing requirements of paragraph (i) of this subdivision, a claimant who 18 has filed a claim on or after the effective date of this paragraph shall 19 be permitted to: 20 (A) amend the claim to correct any such failure without leave of court 21 within twenty days after its service, or at any time before the period 22 for responding to it expires, or within twenty days after service of a 23 responsive pleading or motion to dismiss the claim made before service 24 of the responsive pleading that contains an objection or defense based 25 upon the failure to comply with the pleading requirements set forth in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11698-05-6 S. 9792 2 1 paragraph (i) of this subdivision, provided that any such amendment 2 shall be filed and served before an action asserting a like claim 3 against a citizen of the state would be barred under the provisions of 4 article two of the civil practice law and rules; 5 (B) make an application for leave to amend the claim to correct any 6 such failure at any time before an action asserting a like claim against 7 a citizen of the state would be barred under the provisions of article 8 two of the civil practice law and rules, or within forty days after the 9 service of a motion to dismiss that contains an objection or defense 10 based upon the failure of the claim to comply with the pleading require- 11 ments set forth in paragraph (i) of this subdivision. Any such applica- 12 tion shall be accompanied by the proposed amended claim clearly showing 13 the changes or additions to be made to the claim. In determining wheth- 14 er to grant the application pursuant to this subdivision, the court 15 shall consider, among other factors, whether claimant's failure to 16 comply with the pleading requirements set forth in paragraph (i) of this 17 subdivision was excusable; whether the delay in making the application 18 pursuant to this subparagraph was excusable; whether the state had 19 notice of the essential facts constituting the claim; whether the state 20 had an opportunity to investigate the circumstances underlying the 21 amendments proposed to be made by the amended claim; and whether the 22 failure to file or serve upon the attorney general a claim that complied 23 with the pleading requirements of paragraph (i) of this subdivision 24 resulted in substantial prejudice to the state. Any amendment asserted 25 in an amended claim that is permitted to be filed and served pursuant to 26 this subparagraph is deemed to have been interposed at the time the 27 claim was filed and served, unless the original claim does not provide 28 defendant with notice of the transactions, occurrences or series of 29 transactions or occurrences to be proved pursuant to the amended claim. 30 (iii) Notwithstanding the failure of a claim to comply with the plead- 31 ing requirements of paragraph (i) of this subdivision, a claimant who 32 has filed a claim before the effective date of this paragraph shall be 33 permitted to: 34 (A) where the claim was served less than forty days before the effec- 35 tive date of this paragraph, amend the claim to correct any such failure 36 without leave of court within twenty days after its service, or at any 37 time before the period for responding to it expires, or within twenty 38 days after service of a responsive pleading or motion to dismiss the 39 claim made before service of the responsive pleading that contains an 40 objection or defense based upon the failure to comply with the pleading 41 requirements set forth in this subdivision; 42 (B) make an application for leave to amend the claim to correct any 43 such failure at any time before an action asserting a like claim against 44 a citizen of the state would be barred under the provisions of article 45 two of the civil practice law and rules, or within one year of the 46 effective date of this paragraph, whichever is later. Any such applica- 47 tion shall be accompanied by the proposed amended claim clearly showing 48 the changes or additions to be made to the claim. In determining whether 49 to grant the application pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall 50 consider, among other factors, whether claimant's failure to comply with 51 the pleading requirements set forth in paragraph (i) of this subdivision 52 was excusable; whether the delay in making the application pursuant to 53 this subparagraph was excusable; whether the state had notice of the 54 essential facts constituting the claim; whether the state had an oppor- 55 tunity to investigate the circumstances underlying the amendments 56 proposed to be made by the amended claim; and whether the failure to S. 9792 3 1 file or serve upon the attorney general a claim that complied with the 2 pleading requirements of this subdivision resulted in substantial preju- 3 dice to the state. Any amendment asserted in an amended claim that is 4 permitted to be filed and served pursuant to this subparagraph is deemed 5 to have been interposed at the time the claim was filed and served, 6 unless the original claim does not provide defendant with notice of the 7 transactions, occurrences or series of transactions or occurrences, to 8 be proved pursuant to the amended claim. 9 (iv) A claimant who has served a notice of intention to file a claim 10 on or after the effective date of this paragraph shall be permitted to 11 amend the notice of intention to file a claim to correct any failure to 12 comply with the pleading requirements of this subdivision at any time 13 within the period of time to serve such notice of intention to file a 14 claim pursuant to section ten of this act. 15 § 2. Subdivision c of section 11 of the court of claims act, as 16 amended by chapter 223 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 c. (i) Any objection or defense based upon failure to comply with 19 [(i)] (A) the time limitations contained in section ten of this act, 20 [(ii)] (B) the manner of service requirements set forth in subdivision a 21 of this section, or [(iii)] (C) the verification requirements as set 22 forth in subdivision b of this section is waived unless raised, with 23 particularity, either by a motion to dismiss made before service of the 24 responsive pleading is required or in the responsive pleading, and if so 25 waived the court shall not dismiss the claim for such failure. For 26 claims served on or after the effective date of the chapter of the laws 27 of two thousand twenty-six which amended this subdivision, any objection 28 or defense that asserts that the claim fails on its face to comply with 29 the pleading requirements of paragraph (i) of subdivision b of this 30 section, or that the claim fails to include any one of the pleading 31 requirements set forth in paragraph (i) of subdivision b of this 32 section, is waived unless raised, either by a motion to dismiss made 33 before the service of the responsive pleading is required or in the 34 responsive pleading, and if so waived the court shall not dismiss the 35 claim for such failure. 36 (ii) A motion to dismiss the claim that asserts that the claim or the 37 notice of intention to file a claim fails to comply with the pleading 38 requirements in paragraph (i) of subdivision b of this section must be 39 made no later than one hundred twenty days after the filing of the note 40 of issue, or no earlier than thirty days before trial where a note of 41 issue is not required to be filed. 42 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 43 have become a law.